District of Columbia statutes.
38-1205.01

Purposes.

In enacting this subchapter, the Council of the District of Columbia supports the following statutory purposes:

(1)

To authorize the establishment of a public school of law for the District of Columbia; and

(2)

To ensure that the programs and clinical operations of the School of Law of Antioch University, in operation as of February 24, 1987, are adopted initially as the programs and clinical operations of the public School of Law for the District of Columbia.

History

Oct. 26, 1974, Pub. L. 93-471, title V, § 501
as added Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-177, § 2(a), 33 DCR 7241
Mar. 15, 1990, D.C. Law 8-74, § 2(a), 36 DCR 8117

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-1541.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(a) of the Public School of Law Amendment Emergency Act of 1990 (D.C. Act 8-151, January 26, 1990, 37 DCR 1060).